Utah statutes.
63C-9-401.   Executive director.

The board shall:

(1)  appoint an executive director to assist the board in performing its duties under this chapter;

(2) (a)  require the budget and operations subcommittee to review and make recommendations to the board regarding:

(i)  the executive director's annual performance; and

(ii)  the executive director's suggestions for staff, including staff duties, performance, compensation, and personnel;

(b)  approve, deny, or modify the subcommittee's recommendations, which shall be submitted to the board before the board submits its budget recommendations under Subsections 63C-9-301(1)(c) and (d); and

(c)  make rules governing the review, compensation, and bonus process for the executive director and staff.



Amended by Chapter 256, 2006 General Session

